Arkansas statutes. Title 2 Agriculture
Chapter 17 Warehousing of Grain
2-17-237. Discontinuance of business.

Any person operating a public grain warehouse who desires to discontinue the operation at the expiration of his or her license or whose license is suspended, revoked, or cancelled by the Public Grain Warehouse Commissioner or his or her designated representative shall notify the commissioner, all holders of warehouse receipts, and all parties storing grain in the public grain warehouse, if known, or if not known, by advertising in the newspaper of largest general circulation in the community in which the public grain warehouse is located weekly for four (4) consecutive weeks, at least thirty (30) days before the date of expiration of his or her license, of his or her intention to discontinue the public grain warehouse business.

The owners of the grain shall remove or cause to be removed their grain from the public grain warehouse before the expiration of the license.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 83, § 24; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1324.

2-17-238. Disposition of revenues.

All revenues collected under the provisions of this subchapter by the State Plant Board shall be deposited into the Plant Board Fund to be used for the maintenance, operation, support, and improvement of the board.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 83, § 38; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1338; Acts 1993, No. 783, § 4.

Subchapter 3

— Public Warehouses — Title to Grain

Effective Dates. Acts 1981, No. 401, § 7: Mar. 10, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Arkansas grain producers are experiencing severe losses due to their stored grain in public warehouses being sold or encumbered by the public grain warehousemen without their authorization, and that this act is immediately necessary to clarify the law and grant protection to Arkansas farmers. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

2-17-301. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Grain” means rice, soybeans, wheat, corn, rye, oats, barley, flaxseed, sorghum, mixed grain, and other food grains, feed grains, and oil seeds;

“Owner” means the farmer who grows and produces grain and includes the owner of the land from which the grain is produced to the extent that he or she has an interest in the grain, and includes persons, firms, and corporations engaged in the growing and producing of grain whether it be as tenant, renter, landowner, or otherwise; and

“Public grain warehouseman” means any person, firm, or corporation who operates any building, structure, or other protected enclosure used for the purpose of storing grain for a consideration.

While lessor may have come within the definition of “owner” as set forth in subdivision (3) of this section because of lessor's interest in the grain under its statutory landlord's lien, under §18-41-101 this lien existed for only six months. Rufus Comer Farms v. First State Bank, 47 Ark. App. 3, 884 S.W.2d 265 (1994).

Cited: Simmons First Nat'l Bank v. Wells, 279 Ark. 204, 650 S.W.2d 236 (1983).

History.

Acts 1981, No. 401, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1339.

2-17-302. Applicability.

The provisions of this subchapter shall apply to all public grain warehousemen and to the operations of public grain warehouses, unless the public grain warehouse is licensed under the provisions of the United States Warehouse Act, as amended.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 401, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1342.

U.S. Code. The United States Warehouse Act referred to in this section is codified as 7 U.S.C. § 241 et seq.

2-17-303. Title to grain.

Ownership of grain shall not change by reason of an owner's delivering grain to a public grain warehouseman. No public grain warehouseman shall sell or encumber any grain in his or her possession unless the owner of the grain has by written document transferred title of the grain to the warehouseman.

Notwithstanding any provision of the Uniform Commercial Code, as amended, § 4-1-101 et seq., to the contrary or any other law to the contrary, all sales and encumbrances of grain by public grain warehousemen are void and convey no title unless the sales and encumbrances are supported by written documents executed by the owners specifically conveying title to the grain to the public warehousemen.

U. Ark. Little Rock L.J.

Adams, “Clear Title” for Farm Products: Congress and the Arkansas Legislature Attempt to Solve a Troublesome Problem, 10 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 619.

A federally licensed warehouse is exempt from this section. In re Bearhouse, Inc., 84 B.R. 552 (Bankr. W.D. Ark. 1988).

Landlord's claim for rent from the proceeds of grain sales was not protected by this section. Rufus Comer Farms v. First State Bank, 47 Ark. App. 3, 884 S.W.2d 265 (1994).

Unless transfer of title from a producer to a warehouseman has occurred, the grain is to be regarded as stored rather than sold, so the giving and taking of an advance payment does not remove the storer from the bond's protection under §2-17-209. Tucker v. Durham, 285 Ark. 264, 686 S.W.2d 402 (1985).

The language of this section that no title shall be transferred unless title is specifically conveyed to the warehousemen by a written document signed by the owner must be taken literally, and to do less would be to disregard the plain intent and purpose of the statute; thus, language that could be interpreted to mean that the owner was selling his or her grain was not sufficient to comply with the dictates of this section. Cooper, Inc. v. Farm Bureau Mut. Ins. Co., 289 Ark. 218, 711 S.W.2d 155 (1986).

This section does not say a farmer can void an outright sale he or she makes to a warehouseman; rather, only a sale made by a warehouseman of grain delivered to him or her or storage can be voided. Farm Bureau Mut. Ins. Co. v. Wright, 285 Ark. 228, 686 S.W.2d 778 (1985).

This section allows an owner to void a sale made by a warehouseman. Rufus Comer Farms v. First State Bank, 47 Ark. App. 3, 884 S.W.2d 265 (1994).

Cited: Simmons First Nat'l Bank v. Wells, 279 Ark. 204, 650 S.W.2d 236 (1983).

History.

Acts 1981, No. 401, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1340.

2-17-304. Waiver of rights.

Any owner may, by written document signed by him or her or his or her agent, waive any and all rights conferred upon the owner by this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 401, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1341.

Subchapter 4

— Public Warehouses — Receivership

Effective Dates. Acts 1983, No. 342, § 18: Mar. 7, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that farmers would be better served if state law would authorize the Grain Warehouse Commissioner to petition the proper court to serve as receiver in instances where the warehouse becomes insolvent; and that this act is immediately necessary to so provide. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

2-17-401. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Commissioner” means the Public Grain Warehouse Commissioner, who shall be the Director of the State Plant Board or his or her designated representative;

“License” means a license issued under § 2-17-201 et seq.; and

“Warehouse” means a public grain warehouse licensed under § 2-17-201 et seq.

All other terms in this subchapter shall have the same meaning as the same terms used in the Arkansas Public Grain Warehouse Law, § 2-17-201 et seq.

Cited: Reynolds v. Commodity Credit Corp., 300 Ark. 441, 780 S.W.2d 15 (1989).

Cited: Tucker v. Durham, 285 Ark. 264, 686 S.W.2d 402 (1985).

Persons referred to in this section are not parties to the action unless admitted by the court upon application therefor.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 342, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1343.

2-17-402. Filing of petition.

(1)Following summary suspension of a license under §2-17-215 or following a suspension or revocation of a license as otherwise provided in §2-17-201 et seq., the Public Grain Warehouse Commissioner in his or her discretion may file a verified petition in the proper court requesting that the commissioner be appointed as a receiver to take custody of grain stored in the licensee's warehouse and to provide for the disposition of those assets in the manner provided in this subchapter and under the supervision of the court.

The petition shall be filed in the county in which the warehouse is located.

The proper court shall appoint the commissioner as receiver.

Upon the filing of the petition, the court shall issue ex parte such temporary orders as may be necessary to preserve or protect the assets in receivership, or the value thereof, and the rights of depositors, until a plan of disposition is approved.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 342, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1344.

2-17-403. Plan for disposition of grain.

A petition filed by the Public Grain Warehouse Commissioner under §2-17-402 shall be accompanied by the commissioner's plan for disposition of stored grain.

(1)The plan may provide for the pro rata delivery of part or all of the stored grain to depositors holding warehouse receipts or unpriced scale tickets;

The plan may provide for the sale under the supervision of the commissioner of part or all of the stored grain for the benefit of those depositors; or

The plan may provide for any combination thereof, as the commissioner in his or her discretion determines to be necessary to minimize losses.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 342, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1345.

2-17-404. Date for hearing.

When a petition is filed by the Public Grain Warehouse Commissioner under §2-17-402, the clerk of court shall set a date for hearing on the commissioner's proposed plan of disposition at a time not less than ten (10) nor more than fifteen (15) days after the date the petition is filed.

(1)Copies of the petition, the notice of hearing, and the commissioner's plan of disposition shall be served upon the licensee and upon the surety company issuing the licensee's bond in the manner required for service of an original notice.

A delay in effecting service upon the licensee or surety shall not be cause for denying the appointment of a receiver and shall not be grounds for invalidating any action or proceeding in connection therewith.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 342, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1346.

2-17-405. Notice and parties.

The Public Grain Warehouse Commissioner shall cause a copy of each of the documents served upon the licensee under §2-17-404 to be mailed by ordinary mail to every person holding a warehouse receipt or unpriced scale ticket issued by the licensee, as determined by the records of the licensee or the records of the commissioner.

The failure of any person referred to in this section to receive the required notification shall not invalidate the proceedings on the petition for the appointment of a receiver or any portion thereof.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 342, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1347.

2-17-406. Publication of appointment.

When appointed as a receiver under this subchapter, the Public Grain Warehouse Commissioner shall cause notification of the appointment to be published once each week for two (2) consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in each of the counties in which the licensee maintains a business location and in a newspaper of general circulation in this state.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 342, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1348.

2-17-407. Designation of employee to appear.

The Public Grain Warehouse Commissioner may designate an employee of the commissioner to appear on behalf of the commissioner in any proceedings before the court with respect to the receivership and to exercise the functions of the commissioner as receiver, except that the commissioner shall:

Determine whether or not to petition for the appointment as receiver;

Approve the proposed plan for disposition of stored grain;

Approve the proposed plan for distribution of any cash proceeds; and

Approve the proposed final report.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 342, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1349.

2-17-408. Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act.

The actions of the Public Grain Warehouse Commissioner in connection with petitioning for appointment as a receiver and all actions under such appointment shall not be subject to the provisions of the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, §25-15-201 et seq.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 342, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1350.

2-17-409. Joining of surety.

When the Public Grain Warehouse Commissioner is appointed as receiver under this subchapter, the surety on the bond of the licensee shall be joined as a party defendant by the commissioner.

If required by the court, the surety shall pay the bond proceeds, or so much thereof as the court finds necessary, into the court.

When so paid, the surety shall be absolutely discharged from any further liability under the bond to the extent of the payment.

The person shall not be the holder of a warehouse receipt or scale ticket issued by the licensee and shall not have a claim against the licensee, whether as a secured or unsecured creditor, and otherwise shall not have any pecuniary interest in the licensee or the licensee's business.

The merchandiser shall be entitled to reasonable compensation as determined by the commissioner.

A sale of grain shall be made in a commercially reasonable manner and under the supervision of the warehouse section of the commissioner.

The commissioner shall have authority to sell the stored grain, notwithstanding provisions of the Uniform Commercial Code, § 4-1-101 et seq., and any stored grain so sold shall be free of all liens and other encumbrances.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 342, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1351.

2-17-410. Time for filing claims.

When appointed as receiver under this subchapter, the Public Grain Warehouse Commissioner is authorized to give notice in the manner specified by the court to persons holding warehouse receipts or unpriced scale tickets issued by the licensee to file their claims within sixty (60) days after the date of appointment.

Failure to file a timely claim shall defeat the claim with respect to the surety bond and any grain or proceeds from the sale of grain, except to the extent of any excess remaining after all timely claims are paid in full.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 342, § 10; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1352.

2-17-411. Merchandiser to effect sale.

When the court approves the sale of stored grain, the Public Grain Warehouse Commissioner shall employ a merchandiser to effect the sale of those commodities.

A person employed as a merchandiser must meet the following requirements:

The person shall be experienced or knowledgeable in the operation of warehouses licensed under the Arkansas Public Grain Warehouse Law, §2-17-201 et seq., and if the person has ever held a license issued under the Arkansas Public Grain Warehouse Law, §2-17-201 et seq., the person shall never have had that license suspended or revoked;

The person shall be experienced or knowledgeable in the marketing of agricultural products; and

History.

Acts 1983, No. 342, § 11; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1353.

2-17-412. Distribution of grain or proceeds.

The plan of disposition, as approved by the court, shall provide for the distribution of the stored grain or the proceeds from the sale of stored grain or the proceeds from any surety bond, or any combination thereof, less expenses incurred by the Public Grain Warehouse Commissioner in connection with the receivership, to depositors on a pro rata basis as their interests are determined.

Distribution shall be without regard to any setoff, counterclaim, or storage lien or charge.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 342, § 12; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1354.

2-17-413. Temporary continuation of business.

The Public Grain Warehouse Commissioner may, with the approval of the court, continue the operation of all, or any part of, the business of the licensee on a temporary basis and take any other course of action or procedure which will serve the interests of the depositors.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 342, § 13; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1355.

2-17-414. Reimbursement of expenses.

The Public Grain Warehouse Commissioner shall be entitled to reimbursement out of stored grain or proceeds held in receivership for all expenses incurred as court costs or in handling and disposing of stored grains and for all other costs directly attributable to the receivership.

The right of reimbursement of the commissioner shall be before any claims against the stored grain or proceeds of sale and shall constitute a claim against the surety bond of the licensee.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 342, § 14; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1356.

2-17-415. Distribution plan.

(1)In the event the approved plan of disposition requires the sale of stored grain or the distribution of proceeds from the surety bond, or both, the Public Grain Warehouse Commissioner shall submit to the court a proposed plan of distribution of those proceeds.

Upon such notice and hearing as may be required by the court, the court shall accept or modify the proposed plan.

When the plan is approved by the court and executed by the commissioner, the commissioner shall be discharged and the receivership terminated.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 342, § 15; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1357.

2-17-416. Final report.

At the termination of the receivership, the Public Grain Warehouse Commissioner shall file a final report containing the details of his or her actions, together with such additional information as the court may require.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 342, § 16; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1358.